Hawaii statutes.
§157-17 Accounting of licensees. Every
producer-distributor, distributor, and agricultural cooperative subject to
license or regulation under this chapter, in making payments to producers for
milk sold or delivered to such producer-distributor, distributor or
cooperative, shall clearly set forth the unit price for such milk, whether
determined pursuant to federal or state authority or pursuant to agreement,
together with the amount of all premiums, subsidies, differentials, deductions,
service fees, hauling charges, supply expenses, costs, or adjustments of any
nature whatsoever, in such a manner as to fully disclose to the producer the
rate, basis and manner of computing such payments. [L 1967, c 260, §10; HRS
§157-17]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next